New York, session 2025-2026, A503.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 131-bb of the social services law, as added by 2 chapter 666 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 131-bb. Family homelessness and eviction prevention supplement 4 program. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 5 for a local social services district with a population of five million 6 or more, the commissioner shall designate such local social services 7 district to make vouchers available to eligible families under the fami- 8 ly homelessness and eviction prevention supplement ("FHEPS") program, 9 and to administer the program in accordance with a plan approved pursu- 10 ant to 18 N.Y.C.R.R. § 352.3(a)(3), provided however, that the maximum 11 rent for such vouchers shall be set at the United States department of 12 housing and urban development's fair market rent level. 13 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, vouch- 14 ers provided under the family homelessness and eviction prevention 15 supplement ("FHEPS") program under subdivision one of this section shall 16 be made available to eligible runaway and homeless youth under the age 17 of twenty-five who are receiving, or who have previously received, 18 services under section five hundred thirty-two-d of the executive law. 19 Such voucher program shall pay the full rent for undocumented youth, and 20 partial rent for documented youth who have stable employment as deter- 21 mined by the commissioner, who are otherwise eligible under this subdi- 22 vision. Such voucher program shall be administered by the commissioner 23 in accordance with a plan approved pursuant to 18 N.Y.C.R.R. § EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00744-01-5 A. 503 2 1 352.3(a)(3), provided however, that the maximum rent for such vouchers 2 shall be set at the United States department of housing and urban devel- 3 opment's fair market rent level. 4 3. The state shall reimburse the local social services district for 5 payments made under the FHEPS program in a manner consistent with title 6 two of this article. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.